District of Columbia statutes.
1-608.59

Residency.

(a)

The provisions of § 1-608.01(e) shall apply to employment in the Legal Service other than the Senior Executive Service Attorney Service and attorneys employed by the Council of the District of Columbia.

(b)

Notwithstanding the provisions of §§ 1-608.01(e) and 2-1401.01 et seq., any attorney appointed to the Senior Executive Service Attorney Service and attorneys employed by the Council of the District of Columbia shall become a bona fide resident of the District within 180 days of the effective date of the appointment, and shall remain a District resident for the duration of the employment. Failure to become a District resident or to maintain District residency shall result in forfeiture of the position to which the person has been appointed.

(c)

The Director of Personnel may waive the residency requirement in subsection (b) of this section for any individual appointed to a hard-to-fill position pursuant to § 1-608.53.

Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-139, § 859
as added Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-260, § 2(j), 46 DCR 1318
Apr. 12, 2000. D.C. Law 13-91, § 110(e), 47 DCR 520
This section is referenced in § 2-1831.08.
1981 Ed., § 1-609.59.
D.C. Law 13-91, in subsecs. (a) and (b), substituted “the Senior Executive Service Attorney Service and attorneys employed by the Council of the District of Columbia” for “the Senior Executive Attorney Service”.
For temporary addition of subchapter, see note to § 1-608.51.
For temporary (90-day) amendment of section, see § 3(d) of the Legal Services Clarification and Technical Emergency Amendment Act of 1999 (D.C. Act 13-203, December 8, 1999, 46 DCR 10456).
For temporary (90-day) amendment of section, see § 3(d) of the Legal Services Clarification and Technical Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2000 (D.C. Act 13-293, March 7, 2000, 47 DCR 2063).